Utah statutes.
58-56-15.1.   Factory built housing set-up contractor license.

(1)  The scope of the work included under a factory built housing set-up contractor license includes:

(a)  the placement or securing, or both placement and securing, of the factory built housing on a permanent or temporary foundation;

(b)  securing units together, if required; and

(c)  connection of the utilities to a factory built housing unit.

(2)  The scope of work included under a factory built housing set-up contractor license does not include:

(a)  site preparation;

(b)  construction of a permanent foundation; and

(c)  construction of utility services to the near proximity of the factory built housing unit.

(3)  If a dealer is not licensed as a factory built housing set-up contractor, that individual must subcontract the connection services to an individual who is licensed by the division to perform those specific functions under Title 58, Chapter 55, Utah Construction Trades Licensing Act.



Enacted by Chapter 14, 2011 General Session

